Florida, session 2026, SB84.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 14 15 Section 1.âInsurance Solutions Advisory Council.â 16 (1)âThe Insurance Solutions Advisory Council, an advisory 17 council as defined in s. 20.03(7), Florida Statutes, is created 18 within the Office of Insurance Regulation of the Financial 19 Services Commission to compile and analyze available data and 20 evaluate relevant and applicable information relating to this 21 stateâs property and motor vehicle insurance markets. The 22 advisory council shall serve in an advisory capacity to the 23 office and the Legislature. 24 (2)âThe advisory council shall be composed of the following 25 members: 26 (a)Â Three members appointed by the Speaker of the House of 27 Representatives, as follows: 28 1.Â One member representing a property and casualty 29 residential insurer that has issued at least 150,000 homeownersâ 30 insurance policies in this state at the time of the creation of 31 the advisory council. 32 2.Â One member representing a surplus lines insurance 33 company. 34 3.âOne member who is a trial attorney. 35 (b)Â Three members appointed by the President of the Senate, 36 as follows: 37 1.Â One member representing a property and casualty 38 commercial nonresidential insurer. 39 2.Â One member representing a property and casualty 40 residential insurer that has issued fewer than 150,000 41 homeownersâ insurance policies in this state at the time of the 42 creation of the advisory council. 43 3.âOne member who is a public adjuster. 44 (c)Â Three members appointed by the Governor who are not 45 employed by or professionally affiliated with an insurance 46 company or a subsidiary of an insurance company, at least one of 47 whom must be a consumer advocate or a member of a consumer 48 advocacy organization or agency and one of whom must be 49 recommended by the Florida Insurance Council. The Governor shall 50 appoint one such member as the advisory councilâs chair. 51 (d)Â Two members appointed by the Chief Financial Officer, 52 representing insurance agents in this state. 53 (e)Â One member representing Citizens Property Insurance 54 Corporation, selected by the chair of the board of directors of 55 the Citizens Property Insurance Corporation. 56 (f)Â The commissioner of the Office of Insurance Regulation 57 of the Financial Services Commission or his or her designee. 58 (3)âAdvisory council members must be appointed no later 59 than August 1, 2026. Members serve at the pleasure of the 60 officer who appointed them, and a vacancy on the advisory 61 council must be filled in the same manner as the original 62 appointment. Advisory council members shall serve without 63 compensation but are entitled to reimbursement for per diem and 64 travel expenses pursuant to s. 112.061, Florida Statutes. 65 (4)âThe advisory council shall meet at the call of the 66 chair at a time and location in this state designated by the 67 chair. 68 (5)âThe Office of Insurance Regulation of the Financial 69 Services Commission shall provide staffing and administrative 70 assistance to the advisory council in performing its duties. 71 (6)âBeginning October 1, 2026, the advisory council shall 72 submit an annual report to the Governor, the President of the 73 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives 74 regarding its analysis as specified in subsection (1) and any 75 recommendations related to property and motor vehicle insurance 76 in this state. 77 (7)âIn accordance with s. 20.052(8), Florida Statutes, this 78 section is repealed October 2, 2029, unless reviewed and saved 79 from repeal through reenactment by the Legislature. 80 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.